Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Design professional" means a
professional engineer, architect, surveyor, or landscape architect licensed
under chapter 464.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs. [L 2007, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next